Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1425
Immediate family, defined.

Immediate family shall mean a child residing in an individual's household, a spouse of an individual, or an individual claimed by that individual or that individual's spouse as a dependent for federal income tax purposes.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 25.